District of Columbia statutes.
16-1026

Expungement.

Any parent convicted in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia of violating any provision of this subchapter with respect to his or her child may apply to the court for an order to expunge from all official records all records relating to the conviction at such time that the parent’s youngest child has reached the age of 18 years, provided that the parent has no more than 1 conviction for a violation of this subchapter at the time that the application for expungement is made. Any other person convicted of violating the provisions of this subchapter may apply to the court for an order to expunge all records relating to the conviction 5 years after the conviction, or at such time as the child has reached the age of 18 years, whichever shall later occur, provided that the person has no more than 1 conviction for violating any provision of this subchapter at the time that the application for expungement is made.

History

May 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-115, § 7, 33 DCR 2424
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 25(g), 36 DCR 492

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1026.